Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.030

Source of conviction histories.

The Washington state patrol identification, child abuse, and criminal history section as established in *RCW 43.43.700 shall be the primary source of felony conviction histories for filings, plea agreements, and sentencing on felony cases.

[ 1999 c 143 s 50; 1984 c 17 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.43.700 was amended by 2006 c 294 s 1, renaming the "identification, child abuse, and criminal history section" as the "identification and criminal history section."